Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members, powers, and duties. (a) The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ and designate a chief supervisor, a chief assistant supervisor, and such assistant supervisors, sergeants and officers as are provided by law, who deleted text begin shalldeleted text end comprise the Minnesota State Patrol. (b) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end Members of the Minnesota State Patrol deleted text begin shalldeleted text end have the power and authority: (1) as peace officers to enforce the provisions of the law relating to the protection of and use of trunk highways; (2) at all times to direct all traffic on trunk highways in conformance with law, and in the event of a fire or other emergency, or to expedite traffic or to insure safety, to direct traffic on other roads as conditions may require notwithstanding the provisions of law; (3) to serve search warrants related to criminal motor vehicle and traffic violations and arrest warrants, and legal documents anywhere in the state; (4) to serve orders of the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's duly authorized agents issued under the provisions of the Driver's License Law, the Safety Responsibility Act, or relating to authorized brake- and light-testing stations, anywhere in the state and to take possession of any license, permit, or certificate ordered to be surrendered; (5) to inspect official brake and light adjusting stations; (6) to make appearances anywhere within the state for the purpose of conducting traffic safety educational programs and school bus clinics; (7) to exercise upon all trunk highways the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers; (8) to cooperate, under instructions and rules of the commissioner of public safety, with all sheriffs and other police officers anywhere in the state, provided that said employees deleted text begin shalldeleted text end have no power or authority in connection with strikes or industrial disputes; (9) to assist and aid any peace officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy; (10) as peace officers to provide security and protectionnew text begin : (i)new text end to the governor, governor elect, deleted text begin either or both houses of the legislature,deleted text end and state buildings or property in the manner and to the extent determined to be necessary after consultation with the governor, or a designeenew text begin ; and (ii) as provided in section 299E.10new text end . Pursuant to this clause, members of the State Patrol, acting as peace officers have the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers have within their respective jurisdictions; (11) to inspect school buses anywhere in the state for the purposes of determining compliance with vehicle equipment, pollution control, and registration requirements; (12) as peace officers to make arrests for public offenses committed in their presence anywhere within the state. Persons arrested for violations other than traffic violations deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be referred deleted text begin forthwithdeleted text end new text begin immediatelynew text end to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for further investigation or disposition; and (13) to enforce the North American uniform out-of-service criteria and issue out-of-service orders, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 383.5. (c) After consultation with the governor or a designee, the commissioner may require the State Patrol to provide security and protection to supreme court justicesdeleted text begin , legislators,deleted text end and constitutional officers other than the governor, for a limited period and within the limits of existing resources, in response to a credible threat on the individual's life or safety. (d) The state may contract for State Patrol members to render the services described in this section in excess of their regularly scheduled duty hours and patrol members rendering such services deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be compensated in such amounts, manner and under such conditions as the agreement provides. (e) Employees thus employed and designated deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end subscribe an oath. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299E.005] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Principal state official. new text end new text begin "Principal state official" means a state constitutional officer, member of the legislature, or supreme court justice. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Created; director. A deleted text begin divisiondeleted text end new text begin sectionnew text end in the Department of Public Safety to be known as deleted text begin thedeleted text end Capitol deleted text begin Complexdeleted text end Security deleted text begin Divisiondeleted text end new text begin is created within the State Patrol. Capitol Securitynew text end is under the supervision and control of the director of Capitol deleted text begin complexdeleted text end security, who must be a member of the State Patrol and to whom are assigned the duties and responsibilities described in this section. The commissionernew text begin of public safetynew text end may place the director's position in the unclassified service if the position meets the criteria of section 43A.08, subdivision 1a. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Responsibilities. (a) deleted text begin The divisiondeleted text end new text begin Capitol Securitynew text end is responsible and must utilize state employees fornew text begin : (1)new text end security and public information services in state-owned buildings and state leased-to-own buildings in the Capitol Area, as described in section 15B.02new text begin ; and (2) security services for principal state officialsnew text end . deleted text begin Itdeleted text end new text begin The commissionernew text end must provide personnel as are required by the circumstances to insure the orderly conduct of state business and the convenience of the public. Until July 1, 2026, it must provide emergency assistance and security escorts at any location within the Capitol Area, as described in section 15B.02, when requested by a state constitutional officer. (b) As part of deleted text begin the divisiondeleted text end new text begin Capitol Securitynew text end permanent staff, the directornew text begin of Capitol Securitynew text end must establish the position of emergency manager that includes, at a minimum, the following duties: (1) oversight of the consolidation, development, and maintenance of plans and procedures that provide continuity of security operations; (2) the development and implementation of tenant training that addresses threats and emergency procedures; and (3) the development and implementation of threat and emergency exercises. (c) The director must provide a minimum of one state trooper assigned to the Capitol complex at all times. new text begin (d) Subject to available resources, the director must provide for a staffing complement to meet the requirements under section 299E.10. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The director, in consultation with the advisory committee under section 299E.04, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end , at least annually, hold a meeting or meetings to discuss, among other issues, Capitol complex security, emergency planning, public safety, and public access to the Capitol complex. The meetings must include, at a minimum: (1) Capitol complex tenants and state employees; (2) nongovernmental entities, such as lobbyists, vendors, and the media; and (3) the public and public advocacy groups. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Powers and duties transferred. All powers, duties and responsibilities heretofore assigned by law to the commissioner of administration relating to the general function of security in Capitol complex state-owned buildings are hereby transferred to the commissioner of public safety. The commissioner of public safety deleted text begin shall havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end the final authority regarding public safety and security in the Capitol complex. The commissioner of administration deleted text begin shall havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end the powers, duties, and responsibilities relating to the Capitol complex of state-owned buildings as provided under chapter 16B. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Capitol complex. For purposes of this section, the Capitol complex of state-owned buildings deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end as defined in chapter 15B, and acts amendatory thereof and such other state-owned or state-leased buildings and property within the Twin Cities metropolitan area as the governor from time to time may designate. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299E.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15 annually, the commissioner must submit a report on Capitol Security to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government, public safety, and transportation and to the advisory committee on Capitol Area Security. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) provide an overview of the activities of Capitol Security and the protective services unit; new text end new text begin (2) review the activities and performance of the protective services unit; new text end new text begin (3) summarize any credible threats and security assessments, without disclosing sensitive information; new text end new text begin (4) provide summary data for the prior year on the number of: new text end new text begin (i) threat assessments performed; new text end new text begin (ii) credible threats identified; and new text end new text begin (iii) changes from the preceding year in the amounts under items (i) and (ii); new text end new text begin (5) provide security and protective services costs, broken down by type of activity and any reimbursements; and new text end new text begin (6) provide any recommendations for changes in security practices or state law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [299E.10] PROTECTIVE SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Protective services unit. new text end new text begin A protective services unit is established within Capitol Security to perform the duties specified in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Staffing. new text end new text begin The protective services unit must be under the supervision and control of a member of the State Patrol who is a peace officer and holds a supervisory position or rank. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "security services" includes but is not limited to security activities; protective services; identification and assessment of public safety vulnerabilities, risks, and threats; and emergency response. new text end new text begin (b) At a minimum, the duties of the protective services unit are to: new text end new text begin (1) coordinate security services provided to principal state officials, including but not limited to activities as a liaison between principal state officials, the sergeants-at-arms of the senate and house of representatives, the Minnesota Fusion Center, and local law enforcement agencies; new text end new text begin (2) develop and maintain a plan on security services provided to principal state officials, which must include but is not limited to a threat matrix protocol for principal state officials, for use statewide by the state and political subdivisions; new text end new text begin (3) develop protocols or procedures for security services information dissemination related to principal state officials; new text end new text begin (4) analyze effectiveness, speed, deficiencies, and potential enhancements of information technology systems used for communications under clauses (1) to (3); new text end new text begin (5) as necessary, provide for assessment of potential threats to life or safety of a principal state official and develop individualized plans for personal protective services of a principal state official; new text end new text begin (6) review and provide input on plans by political subdivisions and local law enforcement agencies for security services provided to principal state officials; new text end new text begin (7) upon written or electronic request of the speaker of the house or the majority leader of the senate, provide security and protection to either or both houses of the legislature or for any legislative proceeding or event, including but not limited to a meeting of the senate or house of representatives, committee hearing, press conference, or private caucus meeting; and new text end new text begin (8) perform other activities determined to be necessary and related to the duties specified in this subdivision, after consultation with the commissioner and the governor. new text end new text begin (c) The duties of the protective services unit do not include direct personal protective services or emergency response outside the Capitol complex, except in the performance of mutual aid arrangements or agreements or as supplemental support in coordination with a local law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may provide security and protection under paragraph (b), clause (7), in the form and manner the commissioner deems necessary. new text end new text begin (e) The protocols and procedures under paragraph (b) must follow generally accepted practices for security and protective service information gathering and evaluation and must safeguard the due process rights, civil liberties, and privacy rights of individuals. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Agreements with local law enforcement; reimbursement. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may enter into an agreement or similar arrangement with a local law enforcement agency for assistance by local peace officers to meet the security and protective services requirements under this section. new text end new text begin (b) An appropriation to the commissioner for the protective services unit or the State Patrol, other than from the trunk highway fund, is available for reimbursement to a local law enforcement agency for eligible costs of assistance. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must establish a reimbursement process that minimizes submission and implementation burdens. Eligible costs for reimbursement must include but are not limited to time and overtime of personnel, travel expenses, equipment use, and other documented direct costs determined by the commissioner as necessary and reasonable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin IMPLEMENTATION; PROTECTIVE SERVICES UNIT.new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must: new text end new text begin (1) make reasonable efforts to establish a reimbursement process under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 4, within ....... days of the effective date of this section; and new text end new text begin (2) commence implementation, staff assignment, and hiring for the protective services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, within ....... days of the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin REPORT; PROTECTIVE SERVICES IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must submit a report on protective services to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government, public safety, and transportation and to the Advisory Committee on Capitol Area Security. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) provide a status update on implementation of the protective services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10; new text end new text begin (2) summarize the activities of the protective services unit in each of the duties specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (3) provide the plan required under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10, subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (5); and new text end new text begin (4) make recommendations on any relevant changes in state law, including proposed legislation. new text end new text begin (b) By ......., the commissioner must submit a preliminary update on the report that incorporates information available to date under paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (3). By November 15, 2027, the commissioner must submit the final report. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROTECTIVE SERVICES UNIT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for purposes of the protective services unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 299E.10. The base is $....... in each of fiscal years 2028 and 2029. new text end